District of Columbia statutes.
11-102

Status of District of Columbia Court of Appeals.

The highest court of the District of Columbia is the District of Columbia Court of Appeals. Final judgments and decrees of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals are reviewable by the Supreme Court of the United States in accordance with section 1257 of title 28, United States Code .

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 475, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
1981 Ed., § 11-102.
1973 Ed., § 11-102.